Wyoming, session 2025, SF0183.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-2201 is created to read:

ARTICLE 22
PROHIBITION ON WIND AND SOLAR ENERGY FACILITY PROJECTS

35-11-2201. Prohibition on new solar and wind
projects; definitions; legislative findings; repeal; sunset
date.
SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Solar energy facility" means as defined by
W.S. 18-5-501(a)(vi) and shall not include a net metering
system as defined by W.S. 37-16-101(a)(viii);

(ii) "Wind energy facility" means as defined by
W.S. 18-5-501(a)(ii) and shall not include a net metering
system as defined by W.S. 37-16-101(a)(viii).

(b) Beginning the effective date of this act, no
person shall initiate or expand a wind energy facility or
solar energy facility project within the state. The
prohibition imposed by this subsection shall end June 30,
2030.

(c) This article is repealed June 30, 2030 unless the
legislature takes further action.

Section 2. W.S. 1-26-815(d), 18-5-502(a), (d) and
(e), 34-22-105(a)(intro), 34-27-103(a) and (f),
SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159
35-12-102(a)(vii)(E)(intro) and (G)(intro), 35-12-106(a)
and 35-12-115(a)(intro) are amended to read:

1-26-815. Right of eminent domain granted; ways of
necessity for authorized businesses; purposes; extent.

(d) Subject to the moratorium on wind and solar
energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, no person
qualified to exercise the condemnation authority granted by
this section, except a public utility that has been granted
a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant
to W.S. 37-2-205, shall exercise the authority for the
erection, placement or expansion of collector systems
associated with commercial facilities generating
electricity from wind. The prohibition imposed by this
subsection shall be effective immediately and shall end
June 30, 2015 or upon the effective date of legislation
establishing additional conditions for the use of
condemnation authority for the erection, placement or
expansion of collector systems associated with commercial
facilities generating electricity from wind, whichever
occurs earlier June 30, 2030. As used in this subsection,
"collector systems associated with commercial facilities
SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159
generating electricity from wind" means the conductor
infrastructure, including conductors, towers, substations,
switchgear and other components necessary to deliver power
from any commercial facility generating electricity from
wind up to but not including electric substations or
interconnections facilities associated with existing or
proposed transmission lines that serve load or that export
energy from Wyoming.

18-5-502. County regulation of wind or solar energy
projects; exceptions.

(a) It is unlawful to locate, erect, construct,
reconstruct or enlarge a facility without first obtaining a
permit from the board of county commissioners in the county
in which the facility is located, subject to the moratorium
on wind and solar energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201.

(d) Any wind energy facility which is not required to
have a permit pursuant to subsection (c) of this section
shall be required to obtain a permit for any enlargement of
the facility after July 1, 2010, subject to the moratorium
on wind and solar energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201.
SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159

(e) No solar energy facility that has obtained final
county approval where required or that is constructed or
being constructed prior to July 1, 2020 shall be required
to have the permit required by this section. Any solar
energy facility that is not required to have a permit
pursuant to this subsection shall be required to obtain a
permit for any enlargement of the facility after July 1,
2020, subject to the moratorium on wind and solar energy
facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201.

34-22-105. County and municipal authority.

(a) Subject to the moratorium on wind and solar
energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, land-use
regulations of local governments may encourage the use of
solar energy systems. To encourage the use of solar energy
systems, local governments may regulate:

34-27-103. Declaration of wind energy rights.

(a) Subject to the moratorium on wind and solar
energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, wind energy rights
SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159
shall be regarded as an interest in real property and
appurtenant to the surface estate.

(f) Subject to the moratorium on wind and solar
energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, nothing in this
act shall alter, amend, diminish or invalidate wind energy
agreements or conveyances made or entered into prior to
April 1, 2011 provided that a contract, lease, memorandum
or other notice evidencing the acquisition, conveyance or
reservation of the wind energy rights is recorded in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section no later
than July 1, 2011.

35-12-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(vii) "Industrial facility" or "facility" means
any industrial facility with an estimated construction cost
of at least ninety-six million nine hundred thousand
dollars ($96,900,000.00) as of May 30, 1987. Exempt
activities shall not be included in the estimated
construction cost of an industrial facility. The council
SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159
shall adjust this amount, up or down, each year using
recognized construction cost indices as the council
determines to be relevant to the actual change in
construction cost applicable to the general type of
construction covered under this chapter. "Facility" also
includes, regardless of construction cost:

(E) Subject to the moratorium on wind and
solar energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, any
commercial facility generating electricity from wind and
associated collector systems that:

(G) Subject to the moratorium on wind and
solar energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, any
commercial facility generating electricity from solar power
and associated solar collector systems if the facility:

35-12-106. Permit from council required before
commencing construction of facility; electronic permitting;
amendments; exceptions; federal requirements.

(a) Subject to the moratorium on wind and solar
energy facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, no person shall
SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159
commence to construct a facility, as defined in this
chapter, in this state without first obtaining a permit for
that facility from the council. Any facility, for which a
permit is required, shall be constructed, operated and
maintained in conformity with the permit and any terms,
conditions and modifications contained in the permit. A
permit may only be issued pursuant to this chapter or
pursuant to the provisions of W.S. 18-5-501 through
18-5-513 for facilities referred to the council.

35-12-115. Additional requirements by other
governmental agencies not permitted after issuance of
permit; exceptions.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and
subject to the moratorium on wind and solar energy
facilities under W.S. 35-11-2201, no state, intrastate
regional agency or local government may require any
approval, consent, permit, certificate or other condition
for the construction, operation or maintenance of a
facility authorized by a permit issued pursuant to this
chapter except that:

SF0183

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0159
Section 3. This act shall apply to wind and solar
energy facility projects initiated on or after the
effective date of this act. Nothing in this act shall be
construed to prohibit wind or solar energy facility
projects that have begun the local or state permitting
process before the effective date of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0183